Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1908
Full-time student and full-time-equivalent
student, defined.

Full-time student and full-time-equivalent
student have the definitions found in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
pursuant to the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Act.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 8;

Laws 2010, LB956, § 8.